Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 12. PRACTICES AND TRADES RELATED TO WATER, HEALTH, AND SAFETY

SUBTITLE B. PRACTICES RELATED TO HEALTH AND SAFETY

CHAPTER 1957. INDUSTRIAL HYGIENISTS

Sec. 1957.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Industrial Hygiene Title Recognition Act.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1957.002. INDUSTRIAL HYGIENE CERTIFICATION ORGANIZATION. (a) In this chapter, "industrial hygiene certification organization" means a nonprofit corporation established to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession of industrial hygiene by certifying individuals who meet its education, experience, and examination requirements.

(b) The organization must maintain criteria at least as stringent as those adopted by the American Board of Industrial Hygiene.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1957.003. CERTIFICATION REQUIRED. (a) A person may not use the title of or represent to the public that the person is a "certified industrial hygienist" or use the initials "CIH" unless the person is certified by the American Board of Industrial Hygiene as a certified industrial hygienist.

(b) A person may not use the title of or represent to the public that the person is an "industrial hygienist in training" or use the initials "IHIT" unless the person is certified by the American Board of Industrial Hygiene as an industrial hygienist in training.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1957.004. CIVIL PENALTY. (a) A person who violates Section 1957.003 is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation.

(b) The attorney general may bring an action to recover the civil penalty.

(c) A penalty recovered under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2003.